Illinois, session 104th, SB3419.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Interagency Coordinating Committee on 5Transit Innovation, Integration, and Reform Act is amended by 6changing Section 2-15 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 4140/2-15)8    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 9delayed effective date)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2035)11    Sec. 2-15. Committee membership. The Committee shall 12include the following members, appointed by the Secretary:13        (1) one member representing rural public transit 14    providers operating outside of the Northern Illinois 15    Transit Authority service area;16        (2) one member representing small urban public transit 17    providers operating outside of the Northern Illinois 18    Transit Authority service area;19        (3) two members representing regional public transit 20    providers operating outside of the Northern Illinois 21    Transit Authority service area;22        (4) one member representing intercity rail providers;23        (5) one member representing intercity bus providers;  SB3419- 2 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1        (6) one member representing statewide or regional 2    business organizations with interests in transportation, 3    workforce development, or economic growth;4        (7) one member representing an Illinois university 5    that generates significant ridership for the transit 6    system or intercity bus and rail systems near the 7    university's facilities;8        (8) one member representing individuals with 9    disabilities, who is an individual with a disability or 10    has demonstrated experience advocating for and advancing 11    the accessibility and transportation needs of individuals 12    with disabilities; 13        (9) one member representing a labor organization that 14    represents workers employed by downstate transit systems, 15    intercity bus providers, or intercity rail providers;16        (10) one member representing large urban transit 17    agencies;18        (11) one or more members representing the Department 19    that are involved in transit grant administration, project 20    implementation, or procurement;21        (12) additional representatives as determined 22    necessary by the Secretary to ensure subject-matter 23    expertise, community representation, and geographic 24    diversity; and25        (13) one member who shall serve as chair of the 26    Committee.  SB3419- 3 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    The members shall serve without compensation but may be 2reimbursed for necessary expenses associated with service on 3the Committee.4(Source: P.A. 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.) 5    Section 10. The Metropolitan Transit Authority Act is 6amended by changing Sections 7 and 19.5 as follows: 7    (70 ILCS 3605/7)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 307)8    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-457)9    Sec. 7. The Authority shall have power to acquire by 10purchase, condemnation, lease, gift or otherwise all or any 11part of the plant, equipment, property, rights in property, 12reserve funds, employees' pension or retirement funds, special 13funds, franchises, licenses, patents, permits and papers, 14documents and records belonging to any public utility 15operating a transportation system within the metropolitan area 16of Cook County, together with all or any part of the right of 17way, equipment, fixed facilities and other property of any 18kind of any such utility extending beyond the boundaries of 19the metropolitan area of Cook County and forming part of an 20integrated suburban rapid transit, rail transportation 21facility or motor bus operation connecting with rapid transit 22or electric railway lines in super highways of the Authority 23or leading to the unification and integration of a unified 24rapid transit, rail, and motor bus operation in and about the   SB3419- 4 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1metropolitan area of Cook County. Such properties upon 2acquisition by or lease to the Authority shall become and be 3operated as part of the transportation system of the Authority 4and the Authority shall have all powers in connection with 5such properties and such operations as are conferred by this 6Act with respect to the transportation system of the Authority 7located within the metropolitan area of Cook County. The 8Authority shall also have the power to enter into agreements 9to operate any such lines extending beyond the boundaries of 10the metropolitan area; such agreements to be subject to all 11other provisions of this Act. The Authority shall have power 12to contract for or lease for operation and maintenance by the 13Authority, any municipally owned local transportation subways 14or other municipally owned local transportation facilities or 15the facilities of any common carrier or the facilities of any 16local Mass Transit District, organized under the "Local Mass 17Transit Act", approved July 21, 1959, as heretofore and 18hereafter amended, whether such subways or facilities are 19within or without the metropolitan area of Cook County. The 20Authority shall have the power to contract with any local Mass 21Transit District, organized under the "Local Mass Transit 22Act", approved July 21, 1959, as heretofore and hereafter 23amended, or with any common carrier for the construction and 24operation of a transportation system, whether such 25transportation system is within or without the metropolitan 26area of Cook County. However, the Authority shall not have   SB3419- 5 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1power to operate a motor bus facility, the major part of which 2is used for local transportation of passengers in any city, 3village or incorporated town, unless and until the Authority 4shall have secured the right to operate motor buses in such 5municipality for local transportation of passengers in the 6manner stated in Section 11 of this Act.7(Source: P.A. 76-1548.) 8    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457)9    Sec. 7. General powers. 10    (a) The Board of the Authority shall:11        (1) oversee the operations and management of the 12    Authority;13        (2) convey the Northern Illinois Transit Authority's 14    goals, priorities, and requirements to the Authority; and15        (3) convey information, concerns, and recommendations 16    from the Authority to the Executive Director and Board of 17    the Northern Illinois Transit Authority.18    (b) The Board shall manage the debt that was issued and 19outstanding by the Authority and ensure that the obligations 20owed to bondholders are fulfilled.21    (c) The Board may not issue new debt, except for:22        (1) debt or other financial instruments designed to 23    refinance or retire debt that was issued and outstanding 24    on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 25    General Assembly;  SB3419- 6 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1        (2) debt or other financial instruments in the 2    amounts, terms and conditions, and other requirements 3    provided for in the Full Funding Grant Agreement in the 4    form in which it was executed on January 10, 2025, and in 5    effect on the date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 6    General Assembly (Project ID No. IL-2025-001-00), commonly 7    known as the Red Line Extension Project, and to refinance 8    or retire debt that was issued pursuant to the Full 9    Funding Grant Agreement in the form in which it was 10    executed on January 10, 2025; and11        (3) debt or other financial instruments in the 12    amounts, terms and conditions, and other requirements 13    provided for in the Full Funding Grant Agreement in the 14    form in which it was executed on January 9, 2017, and in 15    effect on the date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 16    General Assembly (Project ID No. IL-2017-002-00), commonly 17    known as the Red and Purple Modernization Phase One 18    Project, and to refinance or retire debt that was issued 19    pursuant to the Full Funding Grant Agreement in the form 20    in which it was executed on January 9, 2017.21    The Authority shall receive revenues sufficient to satisfy 22the financial obligation of the above instruments under the 23Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act. 24    All material changes in the amount, terms and conditions, 25or other requirements of the projects covered by the Full 26Funding Agreements in paragraphs (2) and (3) and occurring   SB3419- 7 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 2General Assembly are subject to the review and approval of the 3Board of the Northern Illinois Transit Authority. The 4Authority shall cooperate with the Northern Illinois Transit 5Authority on the use of alternative issuers of debt or other 6financial instruments or other efforts by the Northern 7Illinois Transit Authority to reduce the debt expense of the 8above-referenced projects, including pursuit of additional 9funding sources. The authorization provided in paragraphs (2) 10and (3) of this subsection shall expire on December 31, 2032.11    (d) In addition to any powers provided in this Act, the 12Authority shall have all of the powers specified in Section 132.20 of the Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, except 14that the powers specified in paragraph (v) of subsection (a) 15of Section 2.20 must be delegated to the Authority by the Board 16of the Northern Illinois Transit Authority.17    (e) The Board shall also have the power to:18        (1) cooperate with the Northern Illinois Transit 19    Authority in the exercise by the Northern Illinois Transit 20    Authority of all the powers granted to the Northern 21    Illinois Transit Authority by the Northern Illinois 22    Transit Authority Act;23        (2) receive funds from the Northern Illinois Transit 24    Authority under Sections 2.02, 4.01, 4.02, 4.09, and 4.10 25    of the Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, as 26    provided in the Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act;  SB3419- 8 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1        (3) receive financial grants from the Northern 2    Illinois Transit Authority;3        (4) adopt ordinances and rules to regulate the use, 4    operation, and maintenance of its property and facilities; 5    and6        (5) carry into effect the powers granted to the 7    Authority, with any necessary fines or penalties, such as 8    the suspension of riding privileges or confiscation of 9    fare media under Section 2.40 of the Northern Illinois 10    Transit Authority Act, as the Board deems proper.11    (f) The Authority shall use powers delegated to it by the 12Northern Illinois Transit Authority to oversee the delivery of 13public transportation in the metropolitan region, provided 14that the Northern Illinois Transit Authority shall retain 15primary responsibility for setting fares, service standards, 16schedules, and coordinated fare collection so that the public 17transportation system in the metropolitan region operates on a 18one-network, one-timetable, one-ticket model for transit 19users.20    (g) The Authority shall establish and maintain an ADA 21Advisory Committee to advise the Authority on accessibility 22and compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 231990 as it relates to fixed route and paratransit service.24        (1) The ADA Advisory Committee shall include:25            (A) members representing riders with disabilities; 26        and  SB3419- 9 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1            (B) members representing organizations serving 2        individuals with disabilities.3        (2) The ADA Advisory Committee shall meet no less than 4    quarterly.5        (3) The ADA Advisory Committee shall present a 6    quarterly report on accessibility to the Authority.7        (4) The ADA Advisory Committee shall present an annual 8    report on accessibility to the Northern Illinois Transit 9    Authority. 10(Source: P.A. 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.) 11    (70 ILCS 3605/19.5)12    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 13delayed effective date)14    Sec. 19.5. Chicago Transit Board.15    (a) The governing body of the Chicago Transit Authority 16shall be the Chicago Transit Board. Beginning September 1, 172026, the Board shall consist of 7 members appointed as 18follows:19        (1) Two members appointed by the Governor, with the 20    advice and consent of the Senate, including:21            (A) a member with an initial term of 5 years who 22        shall serve as a member of the Northern Illinois 23        Transit Authority; and24            (B) a member with an initial term of 3 years.25        (2) Three members appointed by the Mayor of Chicago,   SB3419- 10 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    with the advice and consent of the City Council of the City 2    of Chicago, including:3            (A) a member with an initial term of 3 years who 4        shall serve as a member of the Northern Illinois 5        Transit Authority;6            (B) a member with an initial term of 5 years; and7            (C) a member with an initial term of 3 years.8        (3) Two members appointed by the President of the Cook 9    County Board of Commissioners, with the advice and consent 10    of the Cook County Board of Commissioners, including:11            (A) a member with an initial term of 3 years who 12        shall serve as a member of the Northern Illinois 13        Transit Authority; and14            (B) a member with an initial term of 5 years.15    (b) The subsequent terms of each director appointed under 16subsection (a) shall be 5 years.17    (c) The Chair of the Board shall be elected by a majority 18vote by the members of the Board from among the members of the 19Board. Until September 1, 2030, the Chair of the Board must be 20approved by the Senate. Until September 1, 2030, if the 21members of the Board elect a Chair of the Board, then the 22elected Chair of the Board may serve as a the acting Chair of 23the Board until confirmation. Until September 1, 2030, if the 24Senate votes against confirming the acting Chair of the Board, 25then the acting Chair of the Board must resign and the members 26of the Board must elect a new Chair of the Board.  SB3419- 11 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    (d) Initial appointments of members under subsection (a) 2must be made in time for the members to begin their terms on 3September 1, 2026.4    (e) On September 1, 2026, the terms of all members serving 5on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 6General Assembly, and of any members appointed to fill a 7vacancy, shall immediately expire. If a vacancy on the Board 8occurs before September 1, 2026, then the vacancy shall be 9filled under Section 21. Members serving on the effective date 10of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly may be 11reappointed under subsection (a).12    (f) The members of the Board shall receive an annual 13salary of $15,000, except that members of the Board who are 14also members of the Board of the Northern Illinois Transit 15Authority shall receive $5,000 per year in addition to the 16compensation the members receive for serving on the Board of 17the Northern Illinois Transit Authority.18    (g) Directors shall have diverse and substantial relevant 19experience and expertise for overseeing the planning, 20operation, and funding of a regional transportation system, 21including, but not limited to, backgrounds in urban and 22regional planning, management of large capital projects, labor 23and workforce development, business management, public 24administration, transportation, and community organizations.25    (h) Those responsible for appointing Directors shall 26strive to assemble a set of Directors that, to the greatest   SB3419- 12 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1extent possible, reflects the ethnic, cultural, economic, 2racial, and geographic diversity of the metropolitan region.3    (i) One of the members appointed under paragraph (2) of 4subsection (a) shall be a person with a disability who lives 5within the Authority's service area and uses the services 6provided by the Authority. 7(Source: P.A. 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.) 8    Section 15. The Regional Transportation Authority Act is 9amended by changing Sections 2.30, 3.01, 3A.02, 3A.09, 103B.02.5, 7.03, and 7.04 and by adding Section 3B.09d as 11follows: 12    (70 ILCS 3615/2.30)13    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-457)14    Sec. 2.30. Paratransit services.15    (a) For purposes of this Act, "ADA paratransit services" 16shall mean those comparable or specialized transportation 17services provided by, or under grant or purchase of service 18contracts of, the Service Boards to individuals with 19disabilities who are unable to use fixed route transportation 20systems and who are determined to be eligible, for some or all 21of their trips, for such services under the Americans with 22Disabilities Act of 1990 and its implementing regulations.23    (b) Beginning July 1, 2005, the Authority is responsible 24for the funding, from amounts on deposit in the ADA   SB3419- 13 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1Paratransit Fund established under Section 2.01d of this Act, 2financial review and oversight of all ADA paratransit services 3that are provided by the Authority or by any of the Service 4Boards. The Suburban Bus Board shall operate or provide for 5the operation of all ADA paratransit services by no later than 6July 1, 2006, except that this date may be extended to the 7extent necessary to obtain approval from the Federal Transit 8Administration of the plan prepared pursuant to subsection 9(c).10    (c) No later than January 1, 2006, the Authority, in 11collaboration with the Suburban Bus Board and the Chicago 12Transit Authority, shall develop a plan for the provision of 13ADA paratransit services and submit such plan to the Federal 14Transit Administration for approval. Approval of such plan by 15the Authority shall require the affirmative votes of 12 of the 16then Directors. The Suburban Bus Board, the Chicago Transit 17Authority and the Authority shall comply with the requirements 18of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 and its 19implementing regulations in developing and approving such plan 20including, without limitation, consulting with individuals 21with disabilities and groups representing them in the 22community, and providing adequate opportunity for public 23comment and public hearings. The plan shall include the 24contents required for a paratransit plan pursuant to the 25Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 and its implementing 26regulations. The plan shall also include, without limitation,   SB3419- 14 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1provisions to:2        (1) maintain, at a minimum, the levels of ADA 3    paratransit service that are required to be provided by 4    the Service Boards pursuant to the Americans with 5    Disabilities Act of 1990 and its implementing regulations;6        (2) transfer the appropriate ADA paratransit services, 7    management, personnel, service contracts and assets from 8    the Chicago Transit Authority to the Authority or the 9    Suburban Bus Board, as necessary, by no later than July 1, 10    2006, except that this date may be extended to the extent 11    necessary to obtain approval from the Federal Transit 12    Administration of the plan prepared pursuant to this 13    subsection (c);14        (3) provide for consistent policies throughout the 15    metropolitan region for scheduling of ADA paratransit 16    service trips to and from destinations, with consideration 17    of scheduling of return trips on a "will-call" open-ended 18    basis upon request of the rider, if practicable, and with 19    consideration of an increased number of trips available by 20    subscription service than are available as of the 21    effective date of this amendatory Act;22        (4) provide that service contracts and rates, entered 23    into or set after the approval by the Federal Transit 24    Administration of the plan prepared pursuant to subsection 25    (c) of this Section, with private carriers and taxicabs 26    for ADA paratransit service are procured by means of an   SB3419- 15 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    open procurement process;2        (5) provide for fares, fare collection and billing 3    procedures for ADA paratransit services throughout the 4    metropolitan region;5        (6) provide for performance standards for all ADA 6    paratransit service transportation carriers, with 7    consideration of door-to-door service;8        (7) provide, in cooperation with the Illinois 9    Department of Transportation, the Illinois Department of 10    Public Aid and other appropriate public agencies and 11    private entities, for the application and receipt of 12    grants, including, without limitation, reimbursement from 13    Medicaid or other programs for ADA paratransit services;14        (8) provide for a system of dispatch of ADA 15    paratransit services transportation carriers throughout 16    the metropolitan region, with consideration of 17    county-based dispatch systems already in place as of the 18    effective date of this amendatory Act;19        (9) provide for a process of determining eligibility 20    for ADA paratransit services that complies with the 21    Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 and its 22    implementing regulations;23        (10) provide for consideration of innovative methods 24    to provide and fund ADA paratransit services; and25        (11) provide for the creation of one or more ADA 26    advisory boards, or the reconstitution of the existing ADA   SB3419- 16 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    advisory boards for the Service Boards, to represent the 2    diversity of individuals with disabilities in the 3    metropolitan region and to provide appropriate ongoing 4    input from individuals with disabilities into the 5    operation of ADA paratransit services. 6    (d) All revisions and annual updates to the ADA 7paratransit services plan developed pursuant to subsection (c) 8of this Section, or certifications of continued compliance in 9lieu of plan updates, that are required to be provided to the 10Federal Transit Administration shall be developed by the 11Authority, in collaboration with the Suburban Bus Board and 12the Chicago Transit Authority, and the Authority shall submit 13such revision, update or certification to the Federal Transit 14Administration for approval. Approval of such revisions, 15updates or certifications by the Authority shall require the 16affirmative votes of 12 of the then Directors.17    (e) The Illinois Department of Transportation, the 18Illinois Department of Public Aid, the Authority, the Suburban 19Bus Board and the Chicago Transit Authority shall enter into 20intergovernmental agreements as may be necessary to provide 21funding and accountability for, and implementation of, the 22requirements of this Section.23    (f) By no later than April 1, 2007, the Authority shall 24develop and submit to the General Assembly and the Governor a 25funding plan for ADA paratransit services. Approval of such 26plan by the Authority shall require the affirmative votes of   SB3419- 17 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b112 of the then Directors. The funding plan shall, at a minimum, 2contain an analysis of the current costs of providing ADA 3paratransit services, projections of the long-term costs of 4providing ADA paratransit services, identification of and 5recommendations for possible cost efficiencies in providing 6ADA paratransit services, and identification of and 7recommendations for possible funding sources for providing ADA 8paratransit services. The Illinois Department of 9Transportation, the Illinois Department of Public Aid, the 10Suburban Bus Board, the Chicago Transit Authority and other 11State and local public agencies as appropriate shall cooperate 12with the Authority in the preparation of such funding plan.13    (g) Any funds derived from the federal Medicaid program 14for reimbursement of the costs of providing ADA paratransit 15services within the metropolitan region shall be directed to 16the Authority and shall be used to pay for or reimburse the 17costs of providing such services.18    (h) Nothing in this amendatory Act shall be construed to 19conflict with the requirements of the Americans with 20Disabilities Act of 1990 and its implementing regulations.21(Source: P.A. 94-370, eff. 7-29-05; 95-708, eff. 1-18-08.) 22    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457)23    Sec. 2.30. Paratransit services.24    (a) For purposes of this Act, "ADA paratransit services" 25shall mean those comparable or specialized transportation   SB3419- 18 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1services provided by, or under grant or purchase of service 2contracts of, the Service Boards to individuals with 3disabilities who are unable to use fixed route transportation 4systems and who are determined to be eligible, for some or all 5of their trips, for such services under the Americans with 6Disabilities Act of 1990 and its implementing regulations.7    (b) Beginning July 1, 2005, the Authority is responsible 8for the funding, from amounts on deposit in the ADA 9Paratransit Fund established under Section 2.01d of this Act, 10financial review and oversight of all ADA paratransit services 11that are provided by the Authority or by any of the Service 12Boards. The Suburban Bus Board shall operate or provide for 13the operation of all ADA paratransit services by no later than 14July 1, 2006, except that this date may be extended to the 15extent necessary to obtain approval from the Federal Transit 16Administration of the plan prepared pursuant to subsection 17(c).18    (c) No later than January 1, 2006, the Authority, in 19collaboration with the Suburban Bus Board and the Chicago 20Transit Authority, shall develop a plan for the provision of 21ADA paratransit services and submit such plan to the Federal 22Transit Administration for approval. Approval of such plan by 23the Authority shall require a supermajority vote. The Suburban 24Bus Board, the Chicago Transit Authority and the Authority 25shall comply with the requirements of the Americans with 26Disabilities Act of 1990 and its implementing regulations in   SB3419- 19 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1developing and approving such plan including, without 2limitation, consulting with individuals with disabilities and 3groups representing them in the community, and providing 4adequate opportunity for public comment and public hearings. 5The plan shall include the contents required for a paratransit 6plan pursuant to the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 7and its implementing regulations. The plan shall also include, 8without limitation, provisions to:9        (1) maintain, at a minimum, the levels of ADA 10    paratransit service that are required to be provided by 11    the Service Boards pursuant to the Americans with 12    Disabilities Act of 1990 and its implementing regulations;13        (2) transfer the appropriate ADA paratransit services, 14    management, personnel, service contracts and assets from 15    the Chicago Transit Authority to the Authority or the 16    Suburban Bus Board, as necessary, by no later than July 1, 17    2006, except that this date may be extended to the extent 18    necessary to obtain approval from the Federal Transit 19    Administration of the plan prepared pursuant to this 20    subsection (c);21        (3) provide for consistent policies throughout the 22    metropolitan region for scheduling of ADA paratransit 23    service trips to and from destinations, with consideration 24    of scheduling of return trips on a "will-call" open-ended 25    basis upon request of the rider, if practicable, and with 26    consideration of an increased number of trips available by   SB3419- 20 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    subscription service than are available as of the 2    effective date of this amendatory Act;3        (4) provide that service contracts and rates, entered 4    into or set after the approval by the Federal Transit 5    Administration of the plan prepared pursuant to subsection 6    (c) of this Section, with private carriers and taxicabs 7    for ADA paratransit service are procured by means of an 8    open procurement process;9        (5) provide for fares, fare collection and billing 10    procedures for ADA paratransit services throughout the 11    metropolitan region;12        (6) provide for performance standards for all ADA 13    paratransit service transportation carriers, with 14    consideration of door-to-door service;15        (7) provide, in cooperation with the Illinois 16    Department of Transportation, the Illinois Department of 17    Public Aid and other appropriate public agencies and 18    private entities, for the application and receipt of 19    grants, including, without limitation, reimbursement from 20    Medicaid or other programs for ADA paratransit services;21        (8) provide for a system of dispatch of ADA 22    paratransit services transportation carriers throughout 23    the metropolitan region, with consideration of 24    county-based dispatch systems already in place as of the 25    effective date of this amendatory Act;26        (9) provide for a process of determining eligibility   SB3419- 21 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    for ADA paratransit services that complies with the 2    Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 and its 3    implementing regulations;4        (10) provide for consideration of innovative methods 5    to provide and fund ADA paratransit services; and6        (11) provide for the creation of one or more ADA 7    advisory boards, or the reconstitution of the existing ADA 8    advisory boards for the Service Boards, to represent the 9    diversity of individuals with disabilities in the 10    metropolitan region and to provide appropriate ongoing 11    input from individuals with disabilities into the 12    operation of ADA paratransit services; and 13        (12) incorporate the reports the ADA Advisory 14    Committees established by the Services Boards present to 15    the Authority.16    (d) All revisions and annual updates to the ADA 17paratransit services plan developed pursuant to subsection (c) 18of this Section, or certifications of continued compliance in 19lieu of plan updates, that are required to be provided to the 20Federal Transit Administration shall be developed by the 21Authority, in collaboration with the Suburban Bus Board and 22the Chicago Transit Authority, and the Authority shall submit 23such revision, update or certification to the Federal Transit 24Administration for approval. Approval of such revisions, 25updates or certifications by the Authority shall require a 26supermajority vote.  SB3419- 22 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    (e) The Illinois Department of Transportation, the 2Illinois Department of Public Aid, the Authority, the Suburban 3Bus Board and the Chicago Transit Authority shall enter into 4intergovernmental agreements as may be necessary to provide 5funding and accountability for, and implementation of, the 6requirements of this Section.7    (f) By no later than April 1, 2007, the Authority shall 8develop and submit to the General Assembly and the Governor a 9funding plan for ADA paratransit services. Approval of such 10plan by the Authority shall require a supermajority vote. The 11funding plan shall, at a minimum, contain an analysis of the 12current costs of providing ADA paratransit services, 13projections of the long-term costs of providing ADA 14paratransit services, identification of and recommendations 15for possible cost efficiencies in providing ADA paratransit 16services, and identification of and recommendations for 17possible funding sources for providing ADA paratransit 18services. The Illinois Department of Transportation, the 19Illinois Department of Public Aid, the Suburban Bus Board, the 20Chicago Transit Authority and other State and local public 21agencies as appropriate shall cooperate with the Authority in 22the preparation of such funding plan.23    (g) Any funds derived from the federal Medicaid program 24for reimbursement of the costs of providing ADA paratransit 25services within the metropolitan region shall be directed to 26the Authority and shall be used to pay for or reimburse the   SB3419- 23 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1costs of providing such services.2    (h) Nothing in this amendatory Act shall be construed to 3conflict with the requirements of the Americans with 4Disabilities Act of 1990 and its implementing regulations.5(Source: P.A. 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.) 6    (70 ILCS 3615/3.01)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 703.01)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-457)8    Sec. 3.01. Board of Directors. The corporate authorities 9and governing body of the Authority shall be a Board 10consisting of 13 Directors until April 1, 2008, and 16 11Directors thereafter, appointed as follows:12    (a) Four Directors appointed by the Mayor of the City of 13Chicago, with the advice and consent of the City Council of the 14City of Chicago, and, only until April 1, 2008, a fifth 15director who shall be the Chairman of the Chicago Transit 16Authority. After April 1, 2008, the Mayor of the City of 17Chicago, with the advice and consent of the City Council of the 18City of Chicago, shall appoint a fifth Director. The Directors 19appointed by the Mayor of the City of Chicago shall not be the 20Chairman or a Director of the Chicago Transit Authority. Each 21such Director shall reside in the City of Chicago.22    (b) Four Directors appointed by the votes of a majority of 23the members of the Cook County Board elected from districts, a 24majority of the electors of which reside outside Chicago. 25After April 1, 2008, a fifth Director appointed by the   SB3419- 24 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1President of the Cook County Board with the advice and consent 2of the members of the Cook County Board. Each Director 3appointed under this subparagraph shall reside in that part of 4Cook County outside Chicago.5    (c) Until April 1, 2008, 3 Directors appointed by the 6Chairmen of the County Boards of DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, 7and Will Counties, as follows: 8        (i) Two Directors appointed by the Chairmen of the 9    county boards of Kane, Lake, McHenry and Will Counties, 10    with the concurrence of not less than a majority of the 11    Chairmen from such counties, from nominees by the 12    Chairmen. Each such Chairman may nominate not more than 2 13    persons for each position. Each such Director shall reside 14    in a county in the metropolitan region other than Cook or 15    DuPage Counties.16        (ii) One Director appointed by the Chairman of the 17    DuPage County Board with the advice and consent of the 18    DuPage County Board. Such Director shall reside in DuPage 19    County.20    (d) After April 1, 2008, 5 Directors appointed by the 21Chairmen of the County Boards of DuPage, Kane, Lake and 22McHenry Counties and the County Executive of Will County, as 23follows: 24        (i) One Director appointed by the Chairman of the Kane 25    County Board with the advice and consent of the Kane 26    County Board. Such Director shall reside in Kane County.   SB3419- 25 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1        (ii) One Director appointed by the County Executive of 2    Will County with the advice and consent of the Will County 3    Board. Such Director shall reside in Will County. 4        (iii) One Director appointed by the Chairman of the 5    DuPage County Board with the advice and consent of the 6    DuPage County Board. Such Director shall reside in DuPage 7    County. 8        (iv) One Director appointed by the Chairman of the 9    Lake County Board with the advice and consent of the Lake 10    County Board. Such Director shall reside in Lake County. 11        (v) One Director appointed by the Chairman of the 12    McHenry County Board with the advice and consent of the 13    McHenry County Board. Such Director shall reside in 14    McHenry County. 15        (vi) To implement the changes in appointing authority 16    under this subparagraph (d) the three Directors appointed 17    under subparagraph (c) and residing in Lake County, DuPage 18    County, and Kane County respectively shall each continue 19    to serve as Director until the expiration of their 20    respective term of office and until his or her successor 21    is appointed and qualified or a vacancy occurs in the 22    office. Thereupon, the appointment shall be made by the 23    officials given appointing authority with respect to the 24    Director whose term has expired or office has become 25    vacant. 26    (e) The Chairman serving on the effective date of this   SB3419- 26 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly shall continue to 2serve as Chairman until the expiration of his or her term of 3office and until his or her successor is appointed and 4qualified or a vacancy occurs in the office. Upon the 5expiration or vacancy of the term of the Chairman then serving 6upon the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 95th 7General Assembly, the Chairman shall be appointed by the other 8Directors, by the affirmative vote of at least 11 of the then 9Directors with at least 2 affirmative votes from Directors who 10reside in the City of Chicago, at least 2 affirmative votes 11from Directors who reside in Cook County outside the City of 12Chicago, and at least 2 affirmative votes from Directors who 13reside in the Counties of DuPage, Lake, Will, Kane, or 14McHenry. The chairman shall not be appointed from among the 15other Directors. The chairman shall be a resident of the 16metropolitan region.17    (f) Except as otherwise provided by this Act no Director 18shall, while serving as such, be an officer, a member of the 19Board of Directors or Trustees or an employee of any Service 20Board or transportation agency, or be an employee of the State 21of Illinois or any department or agency thereof, or of any 22municipality, county, or any other unit of local government or 23receive any compensation from any elected or appointed office 24under the Constitution and laws of Illinois; except that a 25Director may be a member of a school board.26    (g) Each appointment made under this Section and under   SB3419- 27 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1Section 3.03 shall be certified by the appointing authority to 2the Board, which shall maintain the certifications as part of 3the official records of the Authority.4    (h) (Blank). 5(Source: P.A. 98-709, eff. 7-16-14.) 6    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457)7    Sec. 3.01. Board of Directors. The corporate authorities 8and governing and administrative body of the Authority shall 9be a Board consisting of 20 Directors appointed as follows:10    (a) Five Directors appointed by the Mayor of the City of 11Chicago, with the advice and consent of the City Council of the 12City of Chicago. Each Director shall reside in the City of 13Chicago. Directors appointed under this subsection shall 14include:15        (1) one Director with an initial term of 5 years who 16    shall serve as a member of the Board of the Chicago Transit 17    Authority;18        (2) one Director with an initial term of 3 years who 19    shall serve as a member of the Board of the Chicago Transit 20    Authority;21        (3) one Director with an initial term of 5 years who 22    shall serve as a director of the Suburban Bus Board;23        (4) one Director with an initial term of 3 years who 24    shall serve as a director of the Commuter Rail Board; and25        (5) one Director with an initial term of 5 years.   SB3419- 28 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    (a-5) Five Directors appointed by the Governor of the 2State of Illinois with the advice and consent of the Senate. 3Each Director appointed under this subsection shall reside in 4the metropolitan region. Directors appointed under this 5subsection shall include:6        (1) one Director with an initial term of 5 years who 7    shall serve as a member of the Board of the Chicago Transit 8    Authority;9        (2) one Director with an initial term of 3 years who 10    shall serve as a director of the Suburban Bus Board;11        (3) one Director appointed by the Governor, with the 12    advice and consent of the Senate, with an initial term of 5 13    years who shall serve as a director of the Commuter Rail 14    Board;15        (4) one Director with an initial term of 5 years; and16        (5) one Director with an initial term of 3 years.17    (b) Five Directors appointed by the President of the Cook 18County Board of Commissioners, with the advice and consent of 19the Cook County Board of Commissioners, including:20        (1) one Director representing those communities in 21    Cook County that are outside of the City of Chicago and 22    north of Devon Avenue who shall reside in the area the 23    Director represents, serve an initial term of 3 years, and 24    serve as a director of the Suburban Bus Board;25        (2) one Director representing those communities in 26    Cook County that are outside of the City of Chicago, south   SB3419- 29 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    of Devon Avenue, and north of Interstate 55, and in 2    addition the Village of Summit who shall reside in the 3    area the Director represents, serve an initial term of 5 4    years, and serve as a director of the Suburban Bus Board;5        (3) one Director representing those communities in 6    Cook County that are outside of the City of Chicago, south 7    of Interstate 55, and west of the Interstate 57, excluding 8    the communities of Summit, Dixmoor, Posen, Robbins, 9    Midlothian, Oak Forest, and Tinley Park who shall reside 10    in the area the Director represents, serve an initial term 11    of 3 years, and serve as a director of the Commuter Rail 12    Board;13        (4) one Director representing those communities in 14    Cook County that are outside of the City of Chicago and 15    east of Interstate 57, and, in addition, the communities 16    of Dixmoor, Posen, Robbins, Midlothian, Oak Forest, and 17    Tinley Park who shall reside in the area the Director 18    represents, serve an initial term of 5 years, and serve as 19    a director of the Commuter Rail Board; and20        (5) one Director with an initial term of 3 years who 21    shall serve as a member of the Board of the Chicago Transit 22    Authority.23    (b-5) Five Directors appointed by the chair of the county 24boards of Kane, Lake, McHenry, DuPage, and Will counties. Each 25chair shall appoint one Director for the chair's county, with 26the advice and consent of the chair's county board. Each   SB3419- 30 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1Director shall reside in the county from which the Director is 2appointed. Directors appointed under this subsection shall 3include:4        (1) one Director appointed by the Chairman of the 5    DuPage County Board with an initial term of 5 years who 6    shall serve as a director of the Suburban Bus Board;7        (2) one Director appointed by the Chairman of the Kane 8    County Board with an initial term of 3 years who shall 9    serve as a director of the Suburban Bus Board;10        (3) one Director appointed by the Chairman of the Lake 11    County Board with an initial term of 3 years who shall 12    serve as a director of the Commuter Rail Board;13        (4) one Director appointed by the Chairman of the 14    McHenry County Board with an initial term of 5 years who 15    shall serve as a director of the Commuter Rail Board; and16        (5) one Director appointed by the County Executive of 17    Will County Board who shall reside in Will County, serve 18    an initial term of 3 years, and serve as a director of the 19    Suburban Bus Board.20    (b-10) On September 1, 2026, the terms of all directors 21serving on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 22104th General Assembly and of any directors appointed to fill 23a vacancy shall immediately expire. If a vacancy on the Board 24occurs before September 1, 2026, then the vacancy shall be 25filled under Section 3.03. Directors serving on the effective 26date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly may   SB3419- 31 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1be reappointed.2    (b-15) Within 120 days of the effective date of this 3amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the appointing 4authorities shall appoint, with the advice and consent 5required under this Section, a new Board of the Authority. 6Directors have been appointed when appointments are filed with 7and accepted by the Secretary of State in accordance with 8subsection (g). The initial Directors appointed after the 9effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 10Assembly shall serve terms of office beginning on September 1, 112026.12    (b-20) On the first meeting of the Board the Directors 13after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 14General Assembly, the Board of Directors shall, by majority 15vote, elect a Director to serve as Chair of the Board. All 16subsequent Chairs of the Board shall be elected by a majority 17vote by the Directors of the Board from among the Directors. 18Until September 1, 2030, the Chair of the Board must be 19confirmed by the Senate. Until September 1, 2030, if the 20Directors elect a Chair of the Board, then the elected Chair of 21the Board may serve as a the acting Chair of the Board until 22confirmation. Until September 1, 2030, if the Senate votes 23against confirming the acting Chair of the Board, then the 24acting Chair of the Board must resign and the Directors must 25elect a new Chair of the Board.26    (b-25) The subsequent terms of each Director appointed   SB3419- 32 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1after September 1, 2026 shall be 5 years. 2    (c) (Blank). 3    (d) (Blank). 4    (e) (Blank).5    (f) Except as otherwise provided by this Act, no Director 6shall, while serving as such, be an officer, member of the 7Board of Directors or Trustees, an employee of any Service 8Board or Transportation Agency, or an employee of the State, 9any department or agency of the State, or any municipality, 10county, or other unit of local government or receive any 11compensation from any elected or appointed office under the 12Constitution and laws of Illinois; except that a Director may 13be a member of a school board, a member of the National Guard, 14or, if the Director is also a member of the Suburban Bus Board, 15an elected officer of a municipality.16    (g) Each appointment made under this Section and under 17Section 3.03 shall be certified by the appointing authority 18and filed with the Secretary of State and the Secretary of the 19Board. The Secretary of the Board shall maintain the 20certifications as part of the official records of the 21Authority.22    (h) (Blank). 23    (i) Directors shall have diverse and substantial relevant 24experience and expertise for overseeing the planning, 25operation, and funding of a regional transportation system, 26including, but not limited to, backgrounds in urban and   SB3419- 33 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1regional planning, management of large capital projects, labor 2and workforce development, business management, public 3administration, transportation, and community organizations.4    (j) Those responsible for appointing Directors shall 5strive to assemble a set of Directors that, to the greatest 6extent possible, reflects the ethnic, cultural, economic, 7racial, and geographic diversity of the metropolitan region. 8    (k) One of the Directors appointed under subsection (a-5) 9shall be a person with a disability with expertise in 10transportation and appointed with the advice and 11recommendation of a disability advocacy organization serving 12the Metropolitan Region. 13(Source: P.A. 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.) 14    (70 ILCS 3615/3A.02)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 703A.02)15    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-457)16    Sec. 3A.02. Suburban Bus Board. The governing body of the 17Suburban Bus Division shall be a board consisting of 13 18directors appointed as follows:19        (a) Six Directors appointed by the members of the Cook 20    County Board elected from that part of Cook County outside 21    of Chicago, or in the event such Board of Commissioners 22    becomes elected from single member districts, by those 23    Commissioners elected from districts, a majority of the 24    residents of which reside outside of Chicago from the 25    chief executive officers of the municipalities, of that   SB3419- 34 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    portion of Cook County outside of Chicago. Provided 2    however, that:3            (i) One of the Directors shall be the chief 4        executive officer of a municipality within the area of 5        the Northwest Region defined in Section 3A.13;6            (ii) One of the Directors shall be the chief 7        executive officer of a municipality within the area of 8        the North Central Region defined in Section 3A.13;9            (iii) One of the Directors shall be the chief 10        executive officer of a municipality within the area of 11        the North Shore Region defined in Section 3A.13;12            (iv) One of the Directors shall be the chief 13        executive officer of a municipality within the area of 14        the Central Region defined in Section 3A.13;15            (v) One of the Directors shall be the chief 16        executive officer of a municipality within the area of 17        the Southwest Region defined in Section 3A.13;18            (vi) One of the Directors shall be the chief 19        executive officer of a municipality within the area of 20        the South Region defined in Section 3A.13;21        (b) One Director by the Chairman of the Kane County 22    Board who shall be a chief executive officer of a 23    municipality within Kane County;24        (c) One Director by the Chairman of the Lake County 25    Board who shall be a chief executive officer of a 26    municipality within Lake County;  SB3419- 35 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1        (d) One Director by the Chairman of the DuPage County 2    Board who shall be a chief executive officer of a 3    municipality within DuPage County;4        (e) One Director by the Chairman of the McHenry County 5    Board who shall be a chief executive officer of a 6    municipality within McHenry County;7        (f) One Director by the Chairman of the Will County 8    Board who shall be a chief executive officer of a 9    municipality within Will County;10        (g) The Commissioner of the Mayor's Office for People 11    with Disabilities, from the City of Chicago, who shall 12    serve as an ex-officio member; and 13        (h) The Chairman by the Governor for the initial term, 14    and thereafter by a majority of the Chairmen of the 15    DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry and Will County Boards and the 16    members of the Cook County Board elected from that part of 17    Cook County outside of Chicago, or in the event such Board 18    of Commissioners is elected from single member districts, 19    by those Commissioners elected from districts, a majority 20    of the electors of which reside outside of Chicago; and 21    who after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 22    95th General Assembly may not be a resident of the City of 23    Chicago.24    Each appointment made under paragraphs (a) through (g) and 25under Section 3A.03 shall be certified by the appointing 26authority to the Suburban Bus Board which shall maintain the   SB3419- 36 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1certifications as part of the official records of the Suburban 2Bus Board; provided that the initial appointments shall be 3certified to the Secretary of State, who shall transmit the 4certifications to the Suburban Bus Board following its 5organization.6    For the purposes of this Section, "chief executive officer 7of a municipality" includes a former chief executive officer 8of a municipality within the specified Region or County, 9provided that the former officer continues to reside within 10such Region or County.11(Source: P.A. 95-906, eff. 8-26-08.) 12    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457)13    Sec. 3A.02. Suburban Bus Board. 14    (a) The governing body of the Suburban Bus Division shall 15be the Suburban Bus Board. Until September 1, 2026, the 16Suburban Bus Board shall consist of 13 directors appointed as 17follows:18        (1) (a) Six Directors appointed by the members of the 19    Cook County Board elected from that part of Cook County 20    outside of Chicago, or in the event such Board of 21    Commissioners becomes elected from single member 22    districts, by those Commissioners elected from districts, 23    a majority of the residents of which reside outside of 24    Chicago from the chief executive officers of the 25    municipalities, of that portion of Cook County outside of   SB3419- 37 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    Chicago. Provided however, that:2            (A) One of the Directors shall be the chief 3        executive officer of a municipality within the area of 4        the Northwest Region defined in Section 3A.13;5            (B) One of the Directors shall be the chief 6        executive officer of a municipality within the area of 7        the North Central Region defined in Section 3A.13;8            (C) One of the Directors shall be the chief 9        executive officer of a municipality within the area of 10        the North Shore Region defined in Section 3A.13;11            (D) One of the Directors shall be the chief 12        executive officer of a municipality within the area of 13        the Central Region defined in Section 3A.13;14            (E) One of the Directors shall be the chief 15        executive officer of a municipality within the area of 16        the Southwest Region defined in Section 3A.13;17            (F) One of the Directors shall be the chief 18        executive officer of a municipality within the area of 19        the South Region defined in Section 3A.13;20        (2) One Director by the Chairman of the Kane County 21    Board who shall be a chief executive officer of a 22    municipality within Kane County;23        (3) One Director by the Chairman of the Lake County 24    Board who shall be a chief executive officer of a 25    municipality within Lake County;26        (4) One Director by the Chairman of the DuPage County   SB3419- 38 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    Board who shall be a chief executive officer of a 2    municipality within DuPage County;3        (5) One Director by the Chairman of the McHenry County 4    Board who shall be a chief executive officer of a 5    municipality within McHenry County;6        (6) One Director by the Chairman of the Will County 7    Board who shall be a chief executive officer of a 8    municipality within Will County;9        (7) The Commissioner of the Mayor's Office for People 10    with Disabilities, from the City of Chicago, who shall 11    serve as an ex officio member; and 12        (8) The Chairman by the Governor for the initial term, 13    and thereafter by a majority of the Chairmen of the 14    DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry and Will County Boards and the 15    members of the Cook County Board elected from that part of 16    Cook County outside of Chicago, or in the event such Board 17    of Commissioners is elected from single member districts, 18    by those Commissioners elected from districts, a majority 19    of the electors of which reside outside of Chicago; and 20    who after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 21    95th General Assembly may not be a resident of the City of 22    Chicago.23    (b) Beginning September 1, 2026, the board shall consist 24of 11 directors appointed as follows:25        (1) One director appointed by the Governor, with the 26    advice and consent of the Senate. The director appointed   SB3419- 39 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    under this paragraph shall have an initial term of 3 2    years. The director appointed under this paragraph shall 3    also serve as a Director of the Northern Illinois Transit 4    Authority.5        (2) One director Two directors appointed by the Mayor 6    of Chicago with the advice and consent of the City Council 7    of the City of Chicago. The director appointed under this 8    paragraph shall have an initial term of 5 years. The 9    director appointed under this paragraph shall serve as a 10    Director of the Board of the Authority. , including:11            (A) a director with an initial term of 5 years who 12        shall serve as a Director on the Board of the 13        Authority; and14            (B) a director with an initial term of 3 years.15        (2.5) One director who is the Commissioner of the City 16    of Chicago's Mayor's Office for People with Disabilities. 17        (3) Three directors appointed by the President of the 18    Cook County Board of Commissioners with the advice and 19    consent of the Cook County Board of Commissioners, 20    including:21            (A) a director with an initial term of 5 years who 22        shall serve as a Director on the Board of the 23        Authority;24            (B) a director with an initial term of 3 years who 25        shall serve as a Director on the Board of the 26        Authority; and  SB3419- 40 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1            (C) a director with an initial term of 5 years.2        (4) One director appointed by the Chairman of the 3    DuPage County Board. The director appointed under this 4    paragraph shall have an initial term of 3 years. The 5    director appointed under this paragraph shall also serve 6    as a Director on the Board of the Authority.7        (5) One director appointed by the Chairman of the Kane 8    County Board. The director appointed under this paragraph 9    shall have an initial term of 5 years. The director 10    appointed under this paragraph shall also serve as a 11    Director on the Board of the Authority.12        (6) One director appointed by the Chairman of the Lake 13    County Board. The director appointed under this paragraph 14    shall have an initial term of 5 years.15        (7) One director appointed by the Chairman of the 16    McHenry County Board. The director appointed under this 17    paragraph shall have an initial term of 3 years.18        (8) One director appointed by the County Executive of 19    Will County Board. The director appointed under this 20    paragraph shall reside in Will County. The director 21    appointed under this paragraph shall have an initial term 22    of 5 years. The director appointed under this paragraph 23    shall also serve as a Director on the Board of the 24    Authority.25    (c) The subsequent terms of each director appointed under 26subsection (b) shall be 5 years.  SB3419- 41 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    (d) The Chair of the Suburban Bus Board shall be elected by 2a majority vote by the directors of the Suburban Bus Board from 3among the directors of the Suburban Bus Board. Until September 41, 2030, the Chair of the Suburban Bus Board must be approved 5by the Senate. Until September 1, 2030, if the directors of the 6Suburban Bus Board elect a Chair of the Suburban Bus Board, 7then the elected Chair of the Suburban Bus Board may serve as a 8the acting Chair of the Suburban Bus Board until confirmation. 9Until September 1, 2030, if the Senate votes against 10confirming the acting Chair of the Suburban Bus Board, then 11the acting Chair of the Suburban Bus Board must resign and the 12directors of the Suburban Bus Board must elect a new Chair of 13the Suburban Bus Board.14    (e) Initial appointments of directors under subsection (b) 15must be made in time for the directors to begin their terms on 16September 1, 2026.17    (f) On September 1, 2026, the terms of all directors 18appointed under subsection (a) and of any directors appointed 19to fill a vacancy shall immediately expire. If a vacancy on the 20Suburban Bus Board occurs before September 1, 2026, then the 21vacancy shall be filled under Section 3A.03. Directors 22appointed under subsection (a) may be reappointed under 23subsection (b).24    (g) Directors shall have diverse and substantial relevant 25experience or expertise in overseeing the planning, operation, 26or funding of a public transportation system, including, but   SB3419- 42 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1not limited to, backgrounds in urban and regional planning, 2management of large capital projects, labor and workforce 3development, business management, public administration, 4transportation, and transit and ridership advocacy.5    (h) Those responsible for appointing directors shall 6strive to assemble a set of directors that, to the greatest 7extent possible, reflects the ethnic, cultural, economic, 8racial, and geographic diversity of the metropolitan region.9(Source: P.A. 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.) 10    (70 ILCS 3615/3A.09)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 703A.09)11    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-457)12    Sec. 3A.09. General powers. In addition to any powers 13elsewhere provided to the Suburban Bus Board, it shall have 14all of the powers specified in Section 2.20 of this Act except 15for the powers specified in Section 2.20(a)(v). The Board 16shall also have the power:17        (a) to cooperate with the Regional Transportation 18    Authority in the exercise by the Regional Transportation 19    Authority of all the powers granted it by such Act;20        (b) to receive funds from the Regional Transportation 21    Authority pursuant to Sections 2.02, 4.01, 4.02, 4.09 and 22    4.10 of the Regional Transportation Authority Act, all as 23    provided in the Regional Transportation Authority Act;24        (c) to receive financial grants from the Regional 25    Transportation Authority or a Service Board, as defined in   SB3419- 43 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    the Regional Transportation Authority Act, upon such terms 2    and conditions as shall be set forth in a grant contract 3    between either the Division and the Regional 4    Transportation Authority or the Division and another 5    Service Board, which contract or agreement may be for such 6    number of years or duration as the parties agree, all as 7    provided in the Regional Transportation Authority Act;8        (d) to perform all functions necessary for the 9    provision of paratransit services under Section 2.30 of 10    this Act;11        (e) to borrow money for the purposes of: (i) 12    constructing a new garage in the northwestern Cook County 13    suburbs, (ii) converting the South Cook garage in Markham 14    to a Compressed Natural Gas facility, (iii) constructing a 15    new paratransit garage in DuPage County, (iv) expanding 16    the North Shore garage in Evanston to accommodate 17    additional indoor bus parking, and (v) purchasing new 18    transit buses. For the purpose of evidencing the 19    obligation of the Suburban Bus Board to repay any money 20    borrowed as provided in this subsection, the Suburban Bus 21    Board may issue revenue bonds from time to time pursuant 22    to ordinance adopted by the Suburban Bus Board, subject to 23    the approval of the Regional Transportation Authority of 24    each such issuance by the affirmative vote of 12 of its 25    then Directors; provided that the Suburban Bus Board may 26    not issue bonds for the purpose of financing the   SB3419- 44 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    acquisition, construction, or improvement of any facility 2    other than those listed in this subsection (e). All such 3    bonds shall be payable solely from the revenues or income 4    or any other funds that the Suburban Bus Board may 5    receive, provided that the Suburban Bus Board may not 6    pledge as security for such bonds the moneys, if any, that 7    the Suburban Bus Board receives from the Regional 8    Transportation Authority pursuant to Section 4.03.3(f) of 9    the Regional Transportation Authority Act. The bonds shall 10    bear interest at a rate not to exceed the maximum rate 11    authorized by the Bond Authorization Act and shall mature 12    at such time or times not exceeding 25 years from their 13    respective dates. Bonds issued pursuant to this paragraph 14    must be issued with scheduled principal or mandatory 15    redemption payments in equal amounts in each fiscal year 16    over the term of the bonds, with the first principal or 17    mandatory redemption payment scheduled within the fiscal 18    year in which bonds are issued or within the next 19    succeeding fiscal year. At least 25%, based on total 20    principal amount, of all bonds authorized pursuant to this 21    Section shall be sold pursuant to notice of sale and 22    public bid. No more than 75%, based on total principal 23    amount, of all bonds authorized pursuant to this Section 24    shall be sold by negotiated sale. The maximum principal 25    amount of the bonds that may be issued may not exceed 26    $100,000,000. The bonds shall have all the qualities of   SB3419- 45 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    negotiable instruments under the laws of this State. To 2    secure the payment of any or all of such bonds and for the 3    purpose of setting forth the covenants and undertakings of 4    the Suburban Bus Board in connection with the issuance 5    thereof and the issuance of any additional bonds payable 6    from such revenue or income as well as the use and 7    application of the revenue or income received by the 8    Suburban Bus Board, the Suburban Bus Board may execute and 9    deliver a trust agreement or agreements; provided that no 10    lien upon any physical property of the Suburban Bus Board 11    shall be created thereby. A remedy for any breach or 12    default of the terms of any such trust agreement by the 13    Suburban Bus Board may be by mandamus proceedings in any 14    court of competent jurisdiction to compel performance and 15    compliance therewith, but the trust agreement may 16    prescribe by whom or on whose behalf such action may be 17    instituted. Under no circumstances shall any bonds issued 18    by the Suburban Bus Board or any other obligation of the 19    Suburban Bus Board in connection with the issuance of such 20    bonds be or become an indebtedness or obligation of the 21    State of Illinois, the Regional Transportation Authority, 22    or any other political subdivision of or municipality 23    within the State, nor shall any such bonds or obligations 24    be or become an indebtedness of the Suburban Bus Board 25    within the purview of any constitutional limitation or 26    provision, and it shall be plainly stated on the face of   SB3419- 46 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    each bond that it does not constitute such an indebtedness 2    or obligation but is payable solely from the revenues or 3    income as aforesaid; and4        (f) to adopt ordinances and make all rules and 5    regulations proper or necessary to regulate the use, 6    operation, and maintenance of its property and facilities 7    and to carry into effect the powers granted to the 8    Suburban Bus Board, with any necessary fines or penalties, 9    such as the suspension of riding privileges or 10    confiscation of fare media under Section 2.40, as the 11    Board deems proper. 12(Source: P.A. 103-281, eff. 1-1-24.) 13    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457)14    Sec. 3A.09. Powers. 15    (a) The Suburban Bus Board shall:16        (1) oversee the operations and management of the 17    Service Board;18        (2) convey the Authority's goals, priorities, and 19    requirements to the Service Board; and20        (3) convey information, concerns, and recommendations 21    from the Service Board to Authority leadership.22    (b) The Suburban Bus Board shall manage the debt that was 23issued and outstanding by its service board predecessor to 24ensure that the obligations owed to bondholders are fulfilled.25    (c) The Suburban Bus Board shall not have the power to   SB3419- 47 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1issue new debt other than debt or other financial instruments 2designed to refinance or retire debt that was issued and 3outstanding on the effective date of this amendatory Act of 4the 104th General Assembly. 5    (d) The status and rights of employees of the Suburban Bus 6Board under any applicable statutes, any applicable collective 7bargaining agreements, or any pension, retirement, or annuity 8plan shall not be affected by this amendatory Act of the 104th 9General Assembly. 10    (e) In addition to any powers elsewhere provided to the 11Suburban Bus Board, it shall have all of the powers specified 12in Section 2.20 of this Act, except that the powers specified 13in Section 2.20(a)(v) must be delegated to the Suburban Bus 14Board by the Board of the Authority. 15    (f) The Suburban Bus Board shall also have the power:16            (1) to cooperate with the Authority in the 17        exercise by the Authority of all the powers granted it 18        by such Act;19            (2) to receive funds from the Authority pursuant 20        to Sections 2.02, 4.01, 4.02, 4.09 and 4.10;21            (3) to receive financial grants from the Authority 22        or a Service Board upon such terms and conditions as 23        shall be set forth in a grant contract between either 24        the Suburban Bus Division and the Authority or the 25        Division and another Service Board, which contract or 26        agreement may be for such number of years or duration   SB3419- 48 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1        as the parties agree;2            (4) to perform all functions necessary for the 3        provision of paratransit services under Section 2.30 4        of this Act; and 5            (5) to adopt ordinances and make all rules and 6        regulations proper or necessary to regulate the use, 7        operation, and maintenance of its property and 8        facilities and to carry into effect the powers granted 9        to the Suburban Bus Board, with any necessary fines or 10        penalties, such as the suspension of riding privileges 11        or confiscation of fare media under Section 2.40, as 12        the Board deems proper. 13    (g) The Suburban Bus Board shall use powers delegated to 14it by the Authority to oversee the delivery of public 15transportation in the metropolitan region, provided that the 16Authority shall retain primary responsibility for setting 17fares, service standards, schedules, and coordinated fare 18collection so that the public transportation system in the 19metropolitan region operates on a one-network, one-timetable, 20one-ticket model for transit users. 21    (h) The Suburban Bus Board shall establish and maintain an 22ADA Advisory Committee to advise the Suburban Bus Board on 23accessibility and compliance with the Americans with 24Disabilities Act of 1990 as it relates to fixed route and 25paratransit service. 26        (1) The ADA Advisory Committee shall include:  SB3419- 49 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1            (A) members representing riders with disabilities; 2        and3            (B) members representing organizations serving 4        individuals with disabilities.5        (2) The ADA Advisory Committee shall meet no less than 6    quarterly.7        (3) The ADA Advisory Committee shall present a 8    quarterly report on accessibility to the Suburban Bus 9    Board.10        (4) The ADA Advisory Committee shall present an annual 11    report on accessibility to the Authority. 12(Source: P.A. 103-281, eff. 1-1-24; 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.) 13    (70 ILCS 3615/3B.02.5)14    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 15delayed effective date)16    Sec. 3B.02.5. Commuter Rail Board. 17    (a) The governing body of the Commuter Rail Division shall 18be the Commuter Rail Board. Beginning September 1, 2026, the 19Commuter Rail Board shall consist of 11 directors appointed as 20follows:21        (1) One director appointed by the Governor, with the 22    advice and consent of the Senate. The director appointed 23    under this paragraph shall have an initial term of 5 24    years. The director appointed under this paragraph shall 25    also serve as a Director of the Northern Illinois Transit   SB3419- 50 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    Authority.2        (2) Two directors appointed by the Mayor of Chicago 3    with the advice and consent of the City Council of the City 4    of Chicago, including:5            (A) a director with an initial term of 3 years who 6        shall also serve as a Director on the Board of the 7        Authority; and8            (B) a director with an initial term of 5 years.9        (3) Three directors appointed by the President of the 10    Cook County Board of Commissioners with the advice and 11    consent of the Cook County Board of Commissioners, 12    including:13            (A) a director with an initial term of 3 years who 14        shall also serve as a Director on the Board of the 15        Authority;16            (B) a director with an initial term of 5 years who 17        shall also serve as a Director on the Board of the 18        Authority; and19            (C) a director with an initial term of 3 years.20        (4) One director appointed by the Chairman of the 21    DuPage County Board. The director appointed under this 22    paragraph shall have an initial term of 5 years.23        (5) One director appointed by the Chairman of the Kane 24    County Board. The director appointed under this paragraph 25    shall have an initial term of 3 years.26        (6) One director appointed by the Chairman of the Lake   SB3419- 51 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    County Board. The director appointed under this paragraph 2    shall have an initial term of 3 years. The director 3    appointed under this paragraph shall also serve as a 4    Director on the Board of the Authority.5        (7) One director appointed by the Chairman of the 6    McHenry County Board. The director appointed under this 7    paragraph shall have an initial term of 5 years. The 8    director appointed under this paragraph shall also serve 9    as a Director on the Board of the Authority.10        (8) One director appointed by the County Executive of 11    Will County. The director appointed under this paragraph 12    shall reside in Will County. The director appointed under 13    this paragraph shall have an initial term of 3 years.14    (b) The subsequent terms of each director appointed under 15subsection (a) shall be 5 years.16    (c) The Chair of the Commuter Rail Board shall be elected 17by a majority vote by the directors of the Commuter Rail Board 18from among the directors of the Commuter Rail Board. Until 19September 1, 2030, the Chair of the Commuter Rail Board must be 20approved by the Senate. Until September 1, 2030, if the 21directors of the Commuter Rail Board elect a Chair of the 22Commuter Rail Board, then the elected Chair of the Commuter 23Rail Board may serve as a the acting Chair of the Commuter Rail 24Board until confirmation. Until September 1, 2030, if the 25Senate votes against confirming the acting Chair of the 26Commuter Rail Board, then the acting Chair of the Commuter   SB3419- 52 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1Rail Board must resign and the directors of the Commuter Rail 2Board must elect a new Chair of the Commuter Rail Board.3    (d) Initial appointments of directors under subsection (a) 4must be made in time for the directors to begin their terms on 5September 1, 2026.6    (e) On September 1, 2026, the terms of all directors 7serving on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 8104th General Assembly and of any directors appointed to fill 9a vacancy shall immediately expire. If a vacancy on the Board 10occurs before September 1, 2026, then the vacancy shall be 11filled under Section 3B.03. Directors serving on the effective 12date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly may 13be reappointed under subsection (a).14    (f) Directors shall have diverse and substantial relevant 15experience and expertise for overseeing the planning, 16operation, and funding of a regional transportation system, 17including, but not limited to, backgrounds in urban and 18regional planning, management of large capital projects, labor 19and workforce development, business management, public 20administration, transportation, and community organizations.21    (g) Those responsible for appointing directors shall 22strive to assemble a set of directors that, to the greatest 23extent possible, reflects the ethnic, cultural, economic, 24racial, and geographic diversity of the metropolitan region.25    (h) One of the directors appointed under paragraph (3) of 26subsection (a) shall be a person with a disability who uses the   SB3419- 53 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1services provided by the Commuter Rail Division and shall be 2appointed with the advice and recommendation of a disability 3advocacy organization serving the Metropolitan Region. 4(Source: P.A. 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.) 5    (70 ILCS 3615/3B.09d new)6    Sec. 3B.09d. ADA Advisory Committee. The Commuter Rail 7Board shall establish and maintain an ADA Advisory Committee 8to advise the Commuter Rail Board on accessibility and 9compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act, as it 10relates to fixed route and paratransit service.11        (1) The ADA Advisory Committee shall include:12            (A) members representing riders with disabilities; 13        and14            (B) members representing organizations serving 15        individuals with disabilities.16        (2) The ADA Advisory Committee shall meet no less than 17    quarterly.18        (3) The ADA Advisory Committee shall present a 19    quarterly report on accessibility to the Commuter Rail 20    Board.21        (4) The ADA Advisory Committee shall present an annual 22    report on accessibility to the Authority.  23    (70 ILCS 3615/7.03)24    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a   SB3419- 54 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1delayed effective date)2    Sec. 7.03. ADA Advisory Council. 3    (a) There is established an ADA Advisory Council. The 4Board shall appoint at least 5 and not more than 15 members to 5the ADA Advisory Council.6    (b) The purpose of the ADA Advisory Council is to advise 7the Board of the Authority of the impact of Authority 8policies, programs, and public transportation services on 9disabled transit riders within the metropolitan region and to 10make recommendations for how to improve public transportation 11in the metropolitan region.12    (c) The Board shall strive to assemble an ADA Advisory 13Council that is reflective of the diversity of the 14metropolitan region, the users of the various modes of public 15transportation, and the interests of the residents of the 16region in a strong public transportation system. The Board 17shall strive to include people with disabilities and 18disability advocates in the membership of the ADA Advisory 19Council. 20    (d) ADA Advisory Council members shall be appointed to 21terms of 5 years, may be reappointed to serve multiple terms, 22and may continue to serve after expiration of their terms 23until their successors are appointed.24    (e) The members of the ADA Advisory Council shall elect a 25Chair, who shall preside over meetings, which shall occur 26monthly or on such other schedule as is set by vote of the ADA   SB3419- 55 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1Advisory Council and shall establish meeting agendas in 2consultation with fellow ADA Advisory Council members and the 3Authority.4    (f) Meetings of the ADA Advisory Council shall be held in 5compliance with the Open Meetings Act, and the public shall be 6given an opportunity to attend and comment on matters 7pertaining to the work of the ADA Advisory Council.8    (g) The Authority shall designate one or more staff 9liaisons to provide technical support for the ADA Advisory 10Council and to facilitate direct communication between the ADA 11Advisory Council and those in the Authority responsible for 12delivering public transportation services.13    (h) The ADA Advisory Council shall:14        (1) review and comment on proposed Authority budgets, 15    financial plans, capital programs, fare policies, and 16    service standards;17        (2) convey concerns pertaining to the quality, 18    efficiency, safety, accessibility, and equity of mainline 19    and paratransit public transportation services as they 20    impact disabled riders;21        (3) assess the efficacy of Authority initiatives to 22    protect the safety of disabled riders on the public 23    transportation system;24        (4) prepare and convey recommendations to the 25    Authority for how the Authority can improve the quality, 26    efficiency, and equity of public transportation service   SB3419- 56 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    for disabled riders in the metropolitan region;2        (5) serve as a resource for connecting disabled riders 3    and disability advocacy organizations with those in the 4    Authority responsible for delivering public transportation 5    services;6        (6) advocate for funding, policies, and laws that 7    shall improve public transportation in the metropolitan 8    region; and9        (7) serve as a resource for Authority staff to discuss 10    proposed changes to services, policies, and technologies 11    affecting disabled transit riders before those changes are 12    implemented.13    (i) The Authority shall provide adequate technical support 14so the ADA Advisory Council can function effectively, provide 15regular briefing on service delivery issues and other topics 16of interest for transit riders, make staff responsible for 17delivery of public transportation services accessible to the 18ADA Advisory Council, give the ADA Advisory Council sufficient 19information and time to comment on proposed plans and 20policies, and take into account the comments and 21recommendations of the ADA Advisory Council before taking 22action on initiatives that impact public transit riders.23    (j) The Authority shall establish an Office of Disability 24of Policy and Planning, whose initial responsibilities shall 25include developing ADA-related training standards, complaint 26and comment procedures, paratransit eligibility criteria, and   SB3419- 57 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1a regional Transit Accessibility Plan in collaboration with 2the ADA Advisory Committee.3    (k) Members of the ADA Advisory Council shall serve 4without compensation but shall be entitled to reimbursement of 5reasonable and necessary costs incurred in the performance of 6their duties.7    (l) ADA Advisory Council members are subject to public 8transportation usage requirements applicable to Directors.9(Source: P.A. 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.) 10    (70 ILCS 3615/7.04)11    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 12delayed effective date)13    Sec. 7.04. Riders Advisory Council. 14    (a) There is established a Riders Advisory Council. The 15Board shall appoint at least 5 and not more than 15 members to 16the Riders Advisory Council.17    (b) The purpose of the Riders Advisory Council is to 18advise the Board of the Authority on the impact of Authority 19policies, programs, and public transportation services on 20transit riders within the metropolitan region and to make 21recommendations for how to improve public transportation in 22the metropolitan region.23    (c) The Board shall strive to assemble a Riders Advisory 24Council that is reflective of the diversity of the 25metropolitan region, the users of the various modes of public   SB3419- 58 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1transportation, and the interests of the residents of the 2region in a strong public transportation system. The Board 3shall strive to include people with disabilities and 4disability advocates in the membership of the ADA Advisory 5Council. 6    (d) Members of the Riders Advisory Council shall be 7appointed to terms of 5 years, may be reappointed to serve 8multiple terms, and may continue to serve after expiration of 9their terms until their successors are appointed.10    (e) The members of the Riders Advisory Council shall elect 11a Chair, who shall preside over meetings, which shall occur 12monthly or on such other schedule as is set by vote of the 13Riders Advisory Council, and shall establish meeting agendas 14in consultation with fellow Riders Advisory Council members 15and the Authority.16    (f) Meetings of the Riders Advisory Council shall be held 17in compliance with the Open Meetings Act, and the public shall 18be given an opportunity to attend and comment on matters 19pertaining to the work of the Riders Advisory Council.20    (g) The Authority shall designate one or more staff 21liaisons to provide technical support for the Riders Advisory 22Council and to facilitate direct communication between the 23Riders Advisory Council and those in the Authority responsible 24for delivering public transportation services.25    (h) The Riders Advisory Council shall: 26        (1) review and comment on proposed Authority budgets,   SB3419- 59 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1    financial plans, capital programs, fare policies, and 2    service standards;3        (2) convey rider concerns pertaining to the quality, 4    efficiency, safety, accessibility, and equity of public 5    transportation services;6        (3) assess the efficacy of Authority initiatives to 7    protect the safety of riders on the public transportation 8    system;9        (4) prepare and convey recommendations to the 10    Authority for how the Authority can improve the quality, 11    efficiency, and equity of public transportation service in 12    the metropolitan region;13        (5) serve as a resource for connecting riders and 14    rider advocacy organizations with those in the Authority 15    responsible for delivering public transportation services;16        (6) advocate for funding, policies, and laws that 17    shall improve public transportation in the metropolitan 18    region; and19        (7) serve as a resource for Authority staff to discuss 20    proposed changes to services, policies, and technologies 21    affecting transit riders before those changes are 22    Implemented.23    (i) The Authority shall provide adequate technical support 24so the Riders Advisory Council can function effectively, 25provide regular briefing on service delivery issues and other 26topics of interest for transit riders, make staff responsible   SB3419- 60 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1for delivery of public transportation services accessible to 2the Riders Advisory Council, give the Riders Advisory Council 3sufficient information and time to comment on proposed plans 4and policies, and take into account the comments and 5recommendations of the Riders Advisory Council before taking 6action on initiatives that impact public transit riders.7    (j) Members of the Riders Advisory Council shall serve 8without compensation but shall be entitled to reimbursement of 9reasonable and necessary costs incurred in the performance of 10their duties.11    (k) Riders Advisory Council members are subject to public 12transportation system usage requirements applicable to 13Directors.14(Source: P.A. 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.) 15    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 16changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 17that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 18represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 19not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 20made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 21Public Act.  SB3419- 61 -LRB104 19494 RTM 32942 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 4140/2-154    70 ILCS 3605/7from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 3075    70 ILCS 3605/19.56    70 ILCS 3615/2.307    70 ILCS 3615/3.01from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 703.018    70 ILCS 3615/3A.02from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 703A.029    70 ILCS 3615/3A.09from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 703A.0910    70 ILCS 3615/3B.02.511    70 ILCS 3615/3B.09d new12    70 ILCS 3615/7.0313    70 ILCS 3615/7.04